Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4508.01
Permanency review or case review;
independence coordinator; duties.

At least thirty days prior to each permanency review or
case review, the independence coordinator shall meet with the young adult
to notify the young adult of the date, time, and location of the review, to
explain the purpose of the review, and to identify additional persons the
young adult would like to attend the review and assist in making arrangements
for their attendance.

Laws 2014, LB853, § 38.